Hawaii statutes.
PART 4.
WAREHOUSE RECEIPTS AND BILLS OF LADING:

GENERAL
OBLIGATIONS

§490:7-401 Irregularities in issue of
receipt or bill or conduct of issuer. The obligations imposed by this
article on an issuer apply to a document of title even if:

(1) The document does not comply with the
requirements of this article or of any other statute, rule, or regulation
regarding its issuance, form, or content;

(2) The issuer violated laws regulating the conduct
of its business;

(3) The goods covered by the document were owned by
the bailee when the document was issued; or

(4) The person issuing the document is not a
warehouse but the document purports to be a warehouse receipt. [L 2004, c 163,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next